Utah statutes.
19-1-205.   Assumption of responsibilities.
The department assumes all the policymaking functions, regulatory and
enforcement powers, rights, duties, and responsibilities of the Division of
Environmental Health, the Air Conservation Committee, the Solid and Hazardous
Waste Committee, the Utah Safe Drinking Water Committee, and the Water
Pollution Control Committee previously vested in the Department of Health and
its executive director:
(1)  including programs for individual wastewater disposal systems, liquid
scavenger operations, and vault and earthen pit privies; but
(2)  excluding all other sanitation programs, which shall be administered by
the Department of Health.
